Vermont statutes. Title 24 Municipal and County Government
Subchapter 5. Compensation and Claims

§ 931.
Claims for personal services.

Claims for personal services, except where compensation is fixed by law or by vote of the town or town school district, shall not be allowed to a town or town school district officer, but the auditors shall report claims and the nature and extent of the services at such meeting.

§ 932.
Town may vote compensation.

A town may vote to compensate any or all town officers for their official services.
Such town in annual meeting may fix the compensation of such officers and of town employees.

§ 933.
Selectboard may fix; when.

When a town does not fix the amount of the compensation to be paid such officers and town employees, the selectboard shall fix and determine the same except as to their own pay which shall be fixed by the auditors at the time of the annual town audit. If the town has voted to eliminate the office of auditor and the voters fail to fix the compensation to be paid to members of the selectboard, selectboard members shall be compensated at the rate at which they were compensated during the immediately preceding year.

HISTORY:

Amended

1997, No. 83

(Adj. Sess.), § 3.

§ 934.
Selectboard to adjudicate claims.

The selectboard shall audit and in its discretion may allow claims against the town and draft orders therefor.